Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 3. Enforcement

§ 1081.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Petitioner” means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

“Respondent” means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1082.
Enforcement under Hague Convention.

Under this subchapter, a Vermont court may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if it were a child custody determination.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1083.
Duty to enforce.

A Vermont court shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction in substantial conformity with this chapter or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this chapter and if the determination has not been modified in accordance with this chapter.

A Vermont court may utilize any remedy available under Vermont law to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state. The remedies provided in this subchapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1084.
Temporary visitation.

A Vermont court that does not have jurisdiction to modify a child custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

a visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

the visitation provisions of a child custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

If a Vermont court makes an order under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified in subchapter 2 of this chapter. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or until the period expires.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1085.
Registration of child custody determination.

A child custody determination issued by a court of another state may be registered in Vermont, with or without a simultaneous request for enforcement, by sending to the Family Division of the Superior Court in the county in which a person listed in subdivision (3) of this subsection or the child resides:

a letter or other document requesting registration;

two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered and a statement under penalty of perjury that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration the order has not been modified; and

except as otherwise provided in section 1079 of this title, the name and address of the person seeking registration and any parent or person acting as a parent who has been awarded custody or visitation in the child custody determination sought to be registered.

On receipt of the documents required by subsection (a) of this section, the Family Division of the Superior Court shall:

send the certified copy of the determination to the Court Administrator who shall file it as a foreign judgment; and

serve notice upon the persons named pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this section.

The notice required by subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall state that:

a registered determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in the same manner as a determination issued by a Vermont court;

a hearing to contest the validity of the registered determination must be requested within 20 days after service of notice; and

failure to contest the registration will result in confirmation of the child custody determination and preclude further contest of that determination with respect to any matter that could have been asserted.

A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered order must request a hearing before the court in the county in which such person or the child resides within 20 days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the court shall confirm the registered order unless the person contesting registration establishes that:

the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under subchapter 2 of this chapter;

the child custody determination sought to be registered has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter 2 of this chapter; or

the person contesting registration was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of section 1066 of this title in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which registration is sought.

If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter of law, and the person requesting registration and all persons served shall be notified of the confirmation.

Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 67

, § 2, eff. June 4, 2013.

§ 1086.
Enforcement of registered determination.

A Vermont court may grant any relief normally available under Vermont law to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

A Vermont court shall recognize and enforce but may not modify, except in accordance with subchapter 2 of this chapter, a registered child custody determination of a court of another state.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1087.
Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under this subchapter is commenced in a Vermont court and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under subchapter 2 of this chapter, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement shall continue unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1088.
Expedited enforcement of child custody determination.

A petition under this subchapter shall be verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any order confirming registration shall be attached to the petition. A copy of a certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

A petition for enforcement of a child custody determination shall state:

whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this chapter and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

whether any proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

the present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and in addition to attorney’s fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

if the child custody determination has been registered and confirmed under section 1085 of this title, the date and place of registration.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person with or without the child at a hearing and may enter any order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing must be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request of the petitioner.

An order issued under subsection (c) of this section shall state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child and will order the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under section 1092 of this title, and the order may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate, unless the respondent appears and establishes that:

the child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 1085 of this title and:

the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under subchapter 2 of this chapter;

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter 2 of this chapter; or

the respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of section 1066 of this title, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under section 1084 of this title but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in section 1090 of this title, the petition and order shall be served by any method authorized by Vermont law upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1089.
Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order pursuant to section 1074 of this title, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that:

the child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 1085 of this title and that:

the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under subchapter 2 of this chapter;

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter 2 of this chapter; or

the respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of section 1066 of this title, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under section 1085 of this title but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

The court may award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under section 1091 of this title and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the grounds that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1090.
Warrant to take physical custody of child.

Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of the child if the child is immediately likely to suffer serious physical harm or to be removed from Vermont.

If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or to be removed from Vermont, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition must be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the warrant must include the statements required by subsection 1088(b) of this title.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child shall:

recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;

direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

The respondent must be served with the petition, warrant, and order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout Vermont. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child’s custodian.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1091.
Costs, fees, and expenses.

The court may award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney’s fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care expenses during the course of the proceedings.

The court shall not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1092.
Recognition and enforcement, appeals.

A Vermont court shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this chapter which enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this subchapter in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section 1074 of this title, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1093.
Role of Attorney General; role of law enforcement.

In a case arising under this chapter or involving the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may take any lawful action, including resort to a proceeding under this subchapter or any other available civil proceeding to locate a child, obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there is:

an existing child custody determination;

a request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

a reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

a reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and shall not represent any party.

At the request of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney acting under this section, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist the Attorney General or State’s Attorney with responsibilities under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1094.
Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the Attorney General or State’s Attorney and law enforcement officers under section 1093 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.